test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_caallid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - čäälliđ: # not checked
    čäälliđ+V+Inf: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čäälim
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čäälih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čääli
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čäällieen
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čäälivettee
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čäälliv
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čäällip
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čäälivetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čäälih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čääliim
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čääliih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čaalij
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čäälliáim
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čäälliáid
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čäälliáin
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čaaliim
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čaalijd
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čäälliččim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čäälliččih
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čäälliččij
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du1: čäälliččáim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du2: čäälliččáid
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du3: čäälliččáin
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čäälliččijm
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čäälliččijd
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg1: čäällieem
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg2: čäällieeh
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg3: čäälli
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du1: čäällieen
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du2: čäällivettee
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du3: čäälliuv
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl1: čäälliep
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl2: čäällivetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl3: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+PrsPrc: čäälliee
    čäälliđ+V+PrfPrc: čäällim
    čäälliđ+V+Actio: čäällim
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ess: čäällimin
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Loc: čäällimist
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    čäälliđ+V+Ger: čäällidijn
    čäälliđ+V+VAbess: [čäällihennáá, čäällihinnáá, čäällihánnáá]

  Verb - celkkiđ: # not checked
    celkkiđ+V+Inf: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciälhám
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ciälháh
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciälˊkká
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: celkkeen
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: celkivettee
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: celkkiv
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: celkkip
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: celkivetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: celkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: celkiim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: celkiih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: celkij
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: celkkiáim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: celkkiáid
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: celkkiáin
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: celkiim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: celkijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: celkkiii
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: celkkiččim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: celkkiččih
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: celkkiččij
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du1: celkkiččáim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du2: celkkiččáid
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du3: celkkiččáin
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: celkkiččijm
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: celkkiččijd
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: celkkiččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: celkkieem
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: celkkieeh
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: celkki
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du1: celkkieen
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du2: celkkivettee
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du3: celkkiuv
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: celkkiep
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: celkkivetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: celkkieh
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+PrsPrc: celkkiee
    celkkiđ+V+PrfPrc: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Actio: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ess: celkkimin
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Loc: celkkimist
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    celkkiđ+V+Ger: celkkidijn
    celkkiđ+V+VAbess: [celkkihennáá, celkkihinnáá, celkkihánnáá]


  Verb - peehiđ: # not checked
    peehiđ+V+Inf: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäṿám
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piäṿáh
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäṿá
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pehheen
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pehivettee
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: peehiv
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: peehip
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: peehivetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peehih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: peehiim
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: peehiih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: peeṿij
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: peehiáim
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: peehiáid
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: peehiáin
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: peeṿiim
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: peeṿijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: peehiii
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: peeṿiččim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: peeṿiččih
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: peeṿiččij
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du1: peeṿiččáim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du2: peeṿiččáid
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du3: peeṿiččáin
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: peeṿiččijm
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: peeṿiččijd
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: peeṿiččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: peeheem
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: peeheeh
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: peehi
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du1: peehieen
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du2: peehivettee
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du3: peehiuv
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: peehiep
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: peehivetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: peehieh
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    peehiđ+V+PrsPrc: peehiee
    peehiđ+V+PrfPrc: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Actio: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ess: peehimin
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Loc: peehimist
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    peehiđ+V+Ger: peehidijn
    peehiđ+V+VAbess: [peehihennáá, peehihinnáá, peehihánnáá]


  Verb - uáđđiđ: # not checked
    uáđđiđ+V+Inf: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáˊđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uáˊđáh
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáđ̣á
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáđˊđeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uáˊđivettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uáđđiv
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uáđđip
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uáˊđivetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáđ̣ih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uáđđiim
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uáđđiih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oođđij
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uáđđiáim
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uáđđiáid
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uáđđiáin
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oođđiim
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oođđijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uáđđiii
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: uáđđiččim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: uáđđiččih
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: uáđđiččij
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du1: uáđđiččáim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du2: uáđđiččáid
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du3: uáđđiččáin
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: uáđđiččijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: uáđđiččijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: uáđđiččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: uáđđieem
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: uáđđieeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: uáđđi
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du1: uáđđieen
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du2: uáđđivettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du3: uáđđiuv
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: uáđđiep
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: uáđđivetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: uáđđieh
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+PrsPrc: uáđđiee
    uáđđiđ+V+PrfPrc: uáđđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio: uáđđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ess: uáđđimin
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Loc: uáđđimist
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    uáđđiđ+V+Ger: uáđđidijn
    uáđđiđ+V+VAbess: [uáđđihennáá, uáđđihinnáá, uáđđihánnáá]


  Verb - vyeijiđ: # not checked
    vyeijiđ+V+Inf: vyeijiđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáˊjám
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuáˊijáh
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyáj̣á
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyeiˊjeen
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyeˊjivettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyeijiv
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyeijip
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyeij̣ivetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyeij̣ih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vyeijiim
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vyeijiih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vyeijij
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vyeijiáim
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vyeijiáid
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vyeijiáin
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vyeijiim
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vyeijijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vyeijiii
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: vyeijiččim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: vyeijiččih
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: vyeijiččij
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du1: vyeijiččáim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du2: vyeijiččáid
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du3: vyeijiččáin
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: vyeijiččijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: vyeijiččijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: vyeijiččii
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: vyeijieem
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: vyeijieeh
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: vyeiji
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du1: vyeijieen
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du2: vyeijivettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du3: vyeijiuv
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: vyeijiep
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: vyeijivetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: vyeijieh
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+PrsPrc: vyeijiee
    vyeijiđ+V+PrfPrc: vyeijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio: vyeijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ess: vyeijimin
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Loc: vyeijimist
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    vyeijiđ+V+Ger: vyeijidijn
    vyeijiđ+V+VAbess: [vyeijihennáá, vyeijihinnáá, vyeijihánnáá]
    
